Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Utility Service Extension, Collection Agreements

7-51-401. Extension of utility services.

Except as provided in § 7-82-302, each county, utility district, municipality or other public agency conducting any utility service specifically including waterworks, water plants and water distribution systems and sewage collection and treatment systems is authorized to extend such services beyond the boundaries of such county, utility district, municipality or public agency to customers desiring such service.

Any such county, utility district, municipality or public utility agency shall establish proper charges for the services so rendered so that any such outside service is self-supporting.

No such county, utility district, municipality or public utility agency shall extend its services into sections of roads or streets already occupied by other public agencies rendering the same service, so long as such other public agency continues to render such service.

Acts 1949, ch. 23, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.47 (Williams, §§ 3695.45-3695.47); Acts 1959, ch. 166, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-604.

Cross-References. Contracts between municipalities, title 7, ch. 35, part 3.

Cooperative agreements with counties, §5-1-113.

Extension of utility service beyond municipal limits authorized, §7-34-104.

Extension of water and sewer service beyond corporate limits, §7-35-401.

Powers of municipalities, §7-52-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Flat rate billing for sewer service outside municipal boundaries, OAG 98-0108, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (6/11/98).

A town is not authorized to extend sewer service into areas outside its boundaries that are already being served by another town's system, OAG 01-125, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 116 (8/7/01).

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196.

7-51-402. Collection agreements between governmental units.

Counties, municipalities, utility districts, and cooperatives of this state billing and collecting user's fees, rates or charges for a utility service, including, but not limited to, water, sanitary sewer and electricity, or for garbage and refuse collection and disposal service, are authorized by resolution to enter into agreements with each other to provide for such billing and collection to be done by one for the other on such terms as may be agreed upon, including appropriate compensation. The county legislative body shall act for the county in making such agreements, except where billing and collection of such fees, rates or charges are performed by a board, commission or other agency of the county; provided, that such agreements entered into by a board, commission or other agency of the county shall be subject to approval by the county legislative body. The governing body of a municipality shall act for the municipality in making such agreements except where billing and collection of such fees, rates or charges are performed by a board, commission or other agency of the municipality; provided, that such agreements entered into by a board, commission or other agency of the municipality shall be subject to approval by the governing body of the municipality.

Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of counties, county clerks, municipalities, utility districts and cooperatives to enter into agreements or contracts under any other statute or charter.

Acts 1976, ch. 693, §§ 1, 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A., § 6-1336.